Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 9. Disposition.
§ 16.1-278.17.
Pendente lite support.

In cases involving (i) the custody, visitation or support of a child arising under subdivision A 3 of §

16.1-241

, (ii) spousal support arising under subsection L of §

16.1-241

, or (iii) support, maintenance, care, and custody of a child or support and maintenance of a spouse transferred to the juvenile and domestic relations district court pursuant to §

20-79

, the court may enter support orders in pendente lite proceedings, provided such proceedings are not ex parte.

History.

1991, c. 534.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

Law Review.

For casenote & comment, “A Privilege for ‘Mommy Dearest’? Criticizing Virginia’s Mental Health Records Privilege in Custody Disputes and the Court’s Application in Schwartz v. Schwartz,” see 13 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 1341 (2006).

§ 16.1-278.17:1.
Formula for determination of pendente lite spousal support.

There shall be a presumption in any judicial proceeding for pendente lite spousal support and maintenance under this title that the amount of the award that would result from the application of the formula set forth in this section is the correct amount of spousal support to be awarded. The court may deviate from the presumptive amount as provided in subsection D.

If the court is determining both an award of pendente lite spousal support and maintenance and an award of child support, the court shall first make a determination of the amount of the award of pendente lite spousal support, if any, owed by one party to the other under this section.

If the parties have minor children in common, the presumptive amount of an award of pendente lite spousal support and maintenance shall be the difference between 26 percent of the payor spouse’s monthly gross income and 58 percent of the payee spouse’s monthly gross income. If the parties have no minor children in common, the presumptive amount of the award shall be the difference between 27 percent of the payor spouse’s monthly gross income and 50 percent of the payee spouse’s monthly gross income. For the purposes of this section, monthly gross income shall have the same meaning as it does in §

20-108.2

.

The court may deviate from the presumptive amount for good cause shown, including any relevant evidence relating to the parties’ current financial circumstances or the impact of any tax exemption and any credits resulting from such exemption that indicates the presumptive amount is inappropriate.

The presumptive formula set forth in this section shall only apply to cases where the parties’ combined monthly gross income does not exceed $10,000.

History.

2007, c. 909; 2020, c. 651.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 651, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply only to suits commenced on or after July 1, 2020, and that the provisions of this act shall not be construed to create a material change in circumstances for the purposes of modifying an existing support order.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 651, in subsection C, substituted “26 percent” for “28%” in the first sentence and substituted “27 percent” for “30%,” in the second sentence and deleted “as amended” at the end of the last sentence; in subsection D, inserted “or the impact of any tax exemption and any credits resulting from such exemption”; in subsection E, inserted “presumptive”; and made stylistic changes. For applicability, see Editor’s note.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Family and Juvenile Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 417 (2007).

§ 16.1-278.18.
Money judgments.

Each juvenile and domestic relations district court may enter judgment for money in any amount for arrears of support and maintenance of any person in cases in which (i) the court has previously acquired personal jurisdiction over all necessary parties or a proceeding in which such jurisdiction has been obtained has been referred or transferred to the court by a circuit court or another juvenile and domestic relations district court and (ii) payment of such money has been previously ordered by the court, a circuit court, or another juvenile and domestic relations district court. Such judgment shall include reasonable attorneys’ fees in cases where the total arrearage for support and maintenance, excluding interest, is equal to or greater than three months of support and maintenance. However, no judgment shall be entered unless the motion of a party, a probation officer, a local director of social services, or the court’s own motion is duly served on the person against whom judgment is sought, in accordance with the applicable provisions of law relating to notice when proceedings are reopened. The motion shall contain a caption stating the name of the court, the title of the action, the names of all parties and the address of the party against whom judgment is sought, the amount of arrearage for which judgment is sought, and the date and time when such judgment will be sought. No support order may be retroactively modified. It may, however, be modified with respect to any period during which there is a pending petition for modification in any court, but only from the date that notice of such petition has been given to the responding party.

The judge or clerk of the court shall, upon written request of the obligee under a judgment entered pursuant to this section, certify and deliver an abstract of that judgment to the obligee or Department of Social Services, who may deliver the abstract to the clerk of the circuit court having jurisdiction over appeals from juvenile and domestic relations district court. The clerk shall issue executions of the judgment.

If the judgment amount does not exceed the jurisdictional limits of subdivision (1) of §

16.1-77

, exclusive of interest and any attorneys’ fees, an abstract of any such judgment entered pursuant to this section may be delivered to the clerk of the general district court of the same judicial district. The clerk shall issue executions upon the judgment.

Arrearages accumulated prior to July 1, 1976, shall also be subject to the provisions of this section.

History.

1991, c. 534; 2002, c. 747; 2004, c. 204; 2005, c. 880.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 747, effective October 1, 2002, substituted “local director of social services” for “superintendent of public welfare” in the second sentence of subsection A; and substituted “subdivision (1) of §

16.1-77

” for “§

16.1-77 (1)

” in subsection C.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 204 inserted “in any court” in the last sentence of subsection A.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 880 inserted the second sentence in subsection A.

Law Review.

For 2003/2004 survey of family and juvenile law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2004).

§ 16.1-278.19.
Attorney fees.

In any matter properly before the court, the court may award attorney fees and costs on behalf of any party as the court deems appropriate based on the relative financial ability of the parties and any other relevant factors to attain equity.

History.

1991, c. 534; 2020, c. 185.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts
1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the enactment of
§ 16.1-278.20 by Acts
1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

The 2020 amendment by c. 185 substituted “attorney fees” for “attorneys’ fees” and added “and any other relevant factors to attain equity.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5A M.J. Courts, § 37; 14A M.J. Parent and Child, § 7.

§ 16.1-279.
Repealed by Acts 1991, c. 534.

Cross references.

For current provisions relating to court disposition of certain children, see §§

16.1-278.2

through

16.1-278.19

.

For service of process of motion to reduce support arrearages to judgment, see Rule 8:4, Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court Rules.

§ 16.1-279.1.
Protective order in cases of family abuse.

In cases of family abuse, including any case involving an incarcerated or recently incarcerated respondent against whom a preliminary protective order has been issued pursuant to §

16.1-253.1

, the court may issue a protective order to protect the health and safety of the petitioner and family or household members of the petitioner. A protective order issued under this section may include any one or more of the following conditions to be imposed on the respondent:

Prohibiting acts of family abuse or criminal offenses that result in injury to person or property;

Prohibiting such contacts by the respondent with the petitioner or family or household members of the petitioner as the court deems necessary for the health or safety of such persons;

Granting the petitioner possession of the residence occupied by the parties to the exclusion of the respondent; however, no such grant of possession shall affect title to any real or personal property;

Enjoining the respondent from terminating any necessary utility service to the residence to which the petitioner was granted possession pursuant to subdivision 3 or, where appropriate, ordering the respondent to restore utility services to that residence;

Granting the petitioner and, where appropriate, any other family or household member of the petitioner, exclusive use and possession of a cellular telephone number or electronic device. The court may enjoin the respondent from terminating a cellular telephone number or electronic device before the expiration of the contract term with a third-party provider. The court may enjoin the respondent from using a cellular telephone or other electronic device to locate the petitioner;

Granting the petitioner temporary possession or use of a motor vehicle owned by the petitioner alone or jointly owned by the parties to the exclusion of the respondent and enjoining the respondent from terminating any insurance, registration, or taxes on the motor vehicle and directing the respondent to maintain the insurance, registration, and taxes, as appropriate; however, no such grant of possession or use shall affect title to the vehicle;

Requiring that the respondent provide suitable alternative housing for the petitioner and, if appropriate, any other family or household member and where appropriate, requiring the respondent to pay deposits to connect or restore necessary utility services in the alternative housing provided;

Ordering the respondent to participate in treatment, counseling or other programs as the court deems appropriate;

Granting the petitioner the possession of any companion animal as defined in § 3.2-6500 if such petitioner meets the definition of owner in § 3.2-6500; and

Any other relief necessary for the protection of the petitioner and family or household members of the petitioner, including a provision for temporary custody or visitation of a minor child.

The protective order may be issued for a specified period of time up to a maximum of two years. The protective order shall expire at 11:59 p.m. on the last day specified or at 11:59 p.m. on the last day of the two-year period if no date is specified. Prior to the expiration of the protective order, a petitioner may file a written motion requesting a hearing to extend the order. Proceedings to extend a protective order shall be given precedence on the docket of the court. If the petitioner was a family or household member of the respondent at the time the initial protective order was issued, the court may extend the protective order for a period not longer than two years to protect the health and safety of the petitioner or persons who are family or household members of the petitioner at the time the request for an extension is made. The extension of the protective order shall expire at 11:59 p.m. on the last day specified or at 11:59 p.m. on the last day of the two-year period if no date is specified. Nothing herein shall limit the number of extensions that may be requested or issued.

A copy of the protective order shall be served on the respondent and provided to the petitioner as soon as possible. The court, including a circuit court if the circuit court issued the order, shall forthwith, but in all cases no later than the end of the business day on which the order was issued, enter and transfer electronically to the Virginia Criminal Information Network the respondent’s identifying information and the name, date of birth, sex, and race of each protected person provided to the court and shall forthwith forward the attested copy of the protective order containing any such identifying information to the primary law-enforcement agency responsible for service and entry of protective orders. Upon receipt of the order by the primary law-enforcement agency, the agency shall forthwith verify and enter any modification as necessary to the identifying information and other appropriate information required by the Department of State Police into the Virginia Criminal Information Network established and maintained by the Department pursuant to Chapter 2 (§

52-12

et seq.) of Title 52 and the order shall be served forthwith upon the respondent and due return made to the court. Upon service, the agency making service shall enter the date and time of service and other appropriate information required by the Department of State Police into the Virginia Criminal Information Network and make due return to the court. If the order is later dissolved or modified, a copy of the dissolution or modification order shall also be attested, forwarded forthwith to the primary law-enforcement agency responsible for service and entry of protective orders, and upon receipt of the order by the primary law-enforcement agency, the agency shall forthwith verify and enter any modification as necessary to the identifying information and other appropriate information required by the Department of State Police into the Virginia Criminal Information Network as described above and the order shall be served forthwith and due return made to the court.

Except as otherwise provided in §

16.1-253.2

, a violation of a protective order issued under this section shall constitute contempt of court.

The court may assess costs and attorneys’ fees against either party regardless of whether an order of protection has been issued as a result of a full hearing.

Any judgment, order or decree, whether permanent or temporary, issued by a court of appropriate jurisdiction in another state, the United States or any of its territories, possessions or Commonwealths, the District of Columbia or by any tribal court of appropriate jurisdiction for the purpose of preventing violent or threatening acts or harassment against or contact or communication with or physical proximity to another person, including any of the conditions specified in subsection A, shall be accorded full faith and credit and enforced in the Commonwealth as if it were an order of the Commonwealth, provided reasonable notice and opportunity to be heard were given by the issuing jurisdiction to the person against whom the order is sought to be enforced sufficient to protect such person’s due process rights and consistent with federal law. A person entitled to protection under such a foreign order may file the order in any juvenile and domestic relations district court by filing with the court an attested or exemplified copy of the order. Upon such a filing, the clerk shall forthwith forward an attested copy of the order to the primary law-enforcement agency responsible for service and entry of protective orders which shall, upon receipt, enter the name of the person subject to the order and other appropriate information required by the Department of State Police into the Virginia Criminal Information Network established and maintained by the Department pursuant to Chapter 2 (§

52-12

et seq.) of Title 52. Where practical, the court may transfer information electronically to the Virginia Criminal Information Network.Upon inquiry by any law-enforcement agency of the Commonwealth, the clerk shall make a copy available of any foreign order filed with that court. A law-enforcement officer may, in the performance of his duties, rely upon a copy of a foreign protective order or other suitable evidence which has been provided to him by any source and may also rely upon the statement of any person protected by the order that the order remains in effect.

Either party may at any time file a written motion with the court requesting a hearing to dissolve or modify the order. Proceedings to dissolve or modify a protective order shall be given precedence on the docket of the court. Upon petitioner’s motion to dissolve the protective order, a dissolution order may be issued ex parte by the court with or without a hearing. If an ex parte hearing is held, it shall be heard by the court as soon as practicable. If a dissolution order is issued ex parte, the court shall serve a copy of such dissolution order on respondent in conformity with §§

8.01-286.1

and

8.01-296

.

As used in this section:“Copy” includes a facsimile copy; and“Protective order” includes an initial, modified or extended protective order.

Neither a law-enforcement agency, the attorney for the Commonwealth, a court nor the clerk’s office, nor any employee of them, may disclose, except among themselves, the residential address, telephone number, or place of employment of the person protected by the order or that of the family of such person, except to the extent that disclosure is (i) required by law or the Rules of the Supreme Court, (ii) necessary for law-enforcement purposes, or (iii) permitted by the court for good cause.

No fee shall be charged for filing or serving any petition or order pursuant to this section.

Upon issuance of a protective order, the clerk of the court shall make available to the petitioner information that is published by the Department of Criminal Justice Services for victims of domestic violence or for petitioners in protective order cases.

An appeal of a protective order issued pursuant to this section shall be given expedited review by the Court of Appeals.

A1.

If a protective order is issued pursuant to subsection A, the court may also issue a temporary child support order for the support of any children of the petitioner whom the respondent has a legal obligation to support. Such order shall terminate upon the determination of support pursuant to §

20-108.1

.

History.

1984, c. 631; 1987, c. 497; 1992, c. 886; 1994, cc. 360, 521, 739, 907; 1996, cc. 866, 900, 945; 1997, c. 603; 1998, c. 684; 2000, cc. 34, 654; 2002, cc. 508, 810, 818; 2004, cc. 972, 980; 2006, c. 308; 2008, cc. 73, 246; 2009, cc. 343, 732; 2010, cc. 425, 468; 2011, cc. 445, 480; 2012, cc. 152, 261; 2014, cc. 318, 346, 613; 2016, c. 102; 2018, cc. 38, 652; 2020, c. 137; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2012, cc. 152 and
261, cl. 2 provides: “That beginning July 1, 2013, any circuit court clerk who does not use the Statewide Case Management System operated and maintained by the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court shall provide protective orders directly to the Virginia Criminal Information Network in an electronic format approved by the Department of State Police; and that until July 1, 2013, such clerks shall forthwith forward the protective order to the primary law-enforcement agency providing service and entry of protective orders for entry into the Virginia Criminal Information Network.”

Acts
2014, cc. 318 and
613, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts
2014, c. 346, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 806 of the Acts of Assembly of 2013 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 3 provides: “That any case for which a notice of appeal to the Supreme Court has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, shall continue in the Supreme Court of Virginia and shall not be affected by the provisions of this act.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 4 provides: “That any case for which a petition for appeal in a criminal case to the Court of Appeals has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, and a decision on such petition remains pending, such petition for appeal shall be deemed granted and the clerk of the Court of Appeals shall certify the granting of such petition to the trial court and all counsel. Such case shall be considered mature for purposes of further proceedings from the date of such certificate.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending
§

17.1-400

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective in due course and that the remaining provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

The 1998 amendment,

in subsection B, inserted the present second sentence, substituted “criminal” for “crime” in the present third sentence and added the present fourth sentence; in subsection E, in the first paragraph, substituted “criminal” for “crime” in the present next to last sentence and added the present last sentence; added the present last sentence in subsection F; and added subsection G.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 34 and 654 are identical, and inserted “owned by the petitioner alone or” in subdivision A 4.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by ch. 508, substituted “shall, upon receipt, enter” for “shall, on the date of receipt, enter” in the third sentence of subsections B and E; and added subsections H and I.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 810 and 818 are identical, and in subsection B, inserted “upon receipt” following “The clerk shall” and substituted “upon receipt, enter” for “on the date of receipt, enter” in the third sentence, and deleted “feasible and” preceding “practical” in the fourth sentence; and in subsection E, deleted “or family court” following “district court” in the second sentence, substituted “upon” for “on the date of” in the third sentence, and deleted “feasible and” preceding “practical” in the fourth sentence.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 972 and 980 are identical, and added subsection A1.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 308 added subdivision A 4; redesignated former subdivisions A 4 through A 7 as subdivisions A 5 through A 8; and added the language beginning “and where appropriate” in subdivision A 6.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 73 and 246 are identical, and rewrote subsection B; in subsection E, substituted “shall forthwith forward an attested copy of the order to the primary law-enforcement agency responsible for service and entry of protective orders which” for “shall forward forthwith an attested copy of the order to the local police department or sheriff’s office which” in the third sentence, and deleted “system” following “Virginia Criminal Information Network” in the third and fourth sentences; and added subsection J.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 343 inserted “including any case involving an incarcerated or recently incarcerated respondent against whom a preliminary protective order has been issued pursuant to § 16.2-2531” in subsection A. The reference was changed to

16.1-253.1

at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2009 amendment by c. 732, in subsection B, in the second sentence, substituted “11:59 p.m. on” for “the end of” and “specified or at 11:59 p.m. on the last day of the two-year period” for “identified for
the two-year period and” and “specified” for “identified, it shall expire at the end of the two years following the date of issuance,” in the fourth sentence, inserted “electronically to the Virginia Criminal Information Network the respondent’s” and “and the name, date of birth, sex, and race of each protected person,” deleted “electronically to the Virginia Criminal Information Network” preceding “and shall forthwith” and “and an addendum” preceding “containing any such,” in the fourth sentence, deleted “and addendum” following “receipt of the order,” in the fifth sentence, deleted “and an addendum” following “copy of the order,” inserted “the respondent’s” and “and the name, date of birth, sex, and race of each protected person provided to the court” and deleted “and addendum” following “receipt of the order”; and deleted subsection J, which read: “If any identifying information in the addendum is determined to be incorrect by the entering agency, the agency shall enter the corrected information into the Virginia Criminal Information Network.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 425 and 468 are nearly identical, and divided former subsection B into subsections B and C by inserting the C designation following the second sentence; redesignated former subsections C through I as subsections D through J; in subsection B, substituted “of time up to a maximum of” for “however, unless otherwise authorized by law, a protective order may not be issued under this section for a period longer than” at the end of the first sentence, and added the last five sentences; added the definition of “Protective order” in subsection H; and made stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 445 and 480 are identical, and added “or criminal offenses that result in injury to person or property” in subdivision A 1.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 152 and 261 are identical, and in subsection C, inserted “including a circuit court if the circuit court issued the order” in the second sentence, and deleted the former fourth sentence; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 318 and 613 are identical, and in subdivision A 5 inserted “and enjoining the respondent from terminating any insurance, registration, or taxes on the motor vehicle and directing the respondent to maintain the insurance, registration, and taxes, as appropriate.”

The 2014 amendment by c. 346 added subdivision A 8, redesignated former A 8 as A 9, and made related changes.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 102 substituted “family or household member of the respondent” for “member of the respondent’s family or household” in the fifth sentence of subsection B.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 38 added subdivision A 5, and redesignated remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2018 amendment by c. 652 added subsection K.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 137 added the last three sentences in subsection G.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, effective January 1, 2022, added subsection L.

Law Review.

For 2003/2004 survey of family and juvenile law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2004).

For 2006 survey article, “Family and Juvenile Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

§ 16.1-280.
Commitment of juveniles with mental illness or intellectual disability.

When any juvenile court has found a juvenile to be in need of services or delinquent pursuant to the provisions of this law and reasonably believes such juvenile has mental illness or intellectual disability, the court may commit him to an appropriate hospital or order mandatory outpatient treatment in accordance with the provisions of Article 16 (§

16.1-335

et seq.) or admit him to a training center in accordance with the provisions of §

37.2-806

for observation as to his mental condition. No juvenile shall be committed pursuant to this section or Article 16 (§

16.1-335

et seq.) to a maximum security unit within any state hospital where adults determined to be criminally insane reside. However, the Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services may place a juvenile who has been certified to the circuit court for trial as an adult pursuant to §

16.1-269.6

or

16.1-270

or who has been convicted as an adult of a felony in the circuit court in a unit appropriate for the care and treatment of persons under a criminal charge when, in his discretion, such placement is necessary to protect the security or safety of other patients, staff, or the public. The Commissioner shall notify the committing court of any placement in such unit. The committing court shall review the placement at 30-day intervals.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-178.2; 1960, c. 103; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1977, c. 559; 1978, c. 739; 1981, c. 487; 1988, c. 826; 1990, c. 975; 1994, cc. 859, 949; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2010, cc. 778, 825; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted ”has mental illness or mental retardation” for “is mentally ill or mentally retarded” in the first sentence; and in the third sentence, substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services” and deleted “§” preceding “16.1-270.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 778 and 825 are identical, and inserted “or order mandatory outpatient treatment” and substituted “Article 16 (§

16.1-335

et seq.) of this chapter” for “§§

16.1-338

through

16.1-345

” twice.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “mental illness or intellectual disability” for “mental illness or mental retardation” in the first sentence, and made minor stylistic changes throughout the section.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

10A M.J. Insane & Other Incompetent Persons, § 4.